Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska75-129
Sessions and
hearings; when and where held.

The commission
may hold sessions at any place in the state when deemed necessary to facilitate
the discharge of its duties and may conduct the hearing and other proceedings
provided for in sections 75-101 to 75-801, in
the Major Oil Pipeline Siting Act, in the State Natural Gas Regulation
Act, or under any other law of this state at such place or places in the state
as may, in the judgment of the commission, be the most convenient and practicable
for determining the particular matter before the commission. The commission may hold public meetings as provided in
section 57-1407.

Laws 1963, c. 425, art. I, § 29, p. 1366;

Laws 2003, LB 790, § 69;

Laws 2011, First Spec. Sess., LB1, § 19.

Major Oil Pipeline Siting Act, see section 57-1401.

State Natural Gas Regulation Act, see section 66-1801.